Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB538.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XX-G heading and section 2001-G of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:ARTICLE XX-GSEXUAL VIOLENCE, DATING VIOLENCE, DOMESTIC VIOLENCE [AND], STALKING AND HUMAN TRAFFICKING EDUCATION, PREVENTION AND RESPONSE AT INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND PRIVATE LICENSED SCHOOLSSection 2001-G. Scope of article.123456789101112131415161718192021 This article relates to [college and university] institution of higher education and private licensed school sexual violence, dating violence, domestic violence [and], stalking and human trafficking education, prevention and response.Section 2. The definition of "education program" in section 2002-G of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2002-G. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Education program." An evidence-based sexual violence, dating violence, domestic violence [and], stalking and human trafficking prevention and awareness education program under this article."Human trafficking." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001 (relating to definitions)."Human trafficking PREVENTION organization." A nonprofit organization that specializes in outreach and education programs on human trafficking prevention and awareness in adherence to standards established by the Department of Human Services . RELEVANT OVERSIGHT ORGANIZATIONS, INCLUDING THE PENNSYLVANIA COALITION TO ADVANCE RESPECT, PENNSYLVANIA COALITION AGAINST DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, NATIONAL CHILDREN'S ALLIANCE OR THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON CRIME AND DELINQUENCY.* * *"Involuntary servitude." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001.* * *Section 3. Sections 2003-G(a), (b) and (c) and 2004-G of the 20250HB0538PN2147 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 act are amended to read:Section 2003-G. Education program.(a) General rule.--Institutions of higher education and private licensed schools shall establish and implement an education program for all students. In developing or implementing an education program, institutions of higher education and private licensed schools shall consult with a local rape crisis center and domestic violence program, as appropriate and if available. Institutions of higher education and private licensed schools may consult with a human trafficking PREVENTION organization to develop and implement an education program. The department, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Coalition [Against Rape] TO ADVANCE RESPECT and the Pennsylvania Coalition Against Domestic Violence, shall develop an online clearinghouse of model education programs and other resources to aid institutions of higher education and private licensed schools in fulfilling this requirement. The department may consult with a human trafficking PREVENTION organization to develop the online clearinghouse of model education programs and other resources. Each education program shall provide the following:(1) A discussion of sexual violence, dating violence, domestic violence [and], stalking and human trafficking.(2) A discussion of consent, including an explanation that the victim is not at fault.(3) A discussion of drug and alcohol-facilitated sexual violence.(4) Information relating to risk education and personal protection.(5) Information on where and how to get assistance, 20250HB0538PN2147 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including the importance of medical treatment and evidence collection, and how to report sexual violence to campus authorities and local law enforcement.(6) The possibility of pregnancy and transmission of sexual diseases.(7) Introduction of members of the educational community from:(i) Campus police or security and local law enforcement.(ii) Campus health center, women's center and rape crisis center.(iii) Campus counseling service or any service responsible for psychological counseling and student affairs.(8) A promise of discretion and dignity.(9) A promise of confidentiality for victims of sexual assault to the extent allowable by law.(10) Information regarding confidential resources and services available for victims of sexual violence, dating violence, domestic violence [and], stalking and human trafficking.(b) [(Reserved).] Human trafficking subject matter.--Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the human trafficking prevention component of an education program shall provide students with, at a minimum, the following instruction:(1) Current Federal and State laws relating to human trafficking.(2) Facts and statistics relating to human trafficking in this Commonwealth and throughout the United States.(3) Methods by which human traffickers compel or coerce 20250HB0538PN2147 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 victims to engage in involuntary servitude, including the recruitment of potential victims over social media platforms and the Internet.(4) Risk factors that may make an individual more vulnerable to human trafficking.(5) How to identify potential victims of sexual servitude and involuntary servitude and what to do when a victim is identified.(c) Notification of rights, accommodations and protective measures.--A concise notification of rights, accommodations and protective measures shall be made available in writing and on the institution of higher education's or private licensed school's publicly accessible Internet website to students and employees, including victims of dating violence, domestic violence, sexual violence [and], stalking and human trafficking, regardless of where the incidences occurred, including information regarding:(1) Existing counseling, mental health, health care, victim advocacy, legal assistance and other services available for victims, both within the institution or school and in the community.(2) Available options and assistance regarding how to report to the institution or school, report to law enforcement, obtain protections from abuse and sexual violence protection orders, file for crime victims' compensation and assistance program and request protective measures or changes to academic, living, transportation, working situations or other educational activities.* * *Section 2004-G. Follow-up.20250HB0538PN2147 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 An institution of higher education and private licensed school shall conduct at least one follow-up program for the students in the education program. The follow-up program may consist of the following:(1) Lecturers and interactive learning programs relating to sexual violence, dating violence, domestic violence [and], stalking and human trafficking prevention and awareness.(2) Institutional activities relating to sexual violence, dating violence, domestic violence [and], stalking and human trafficking prevention and awareness.(3) Videos and other educational materials relating to sexual violence, dating violence, domestic violence [and], stalking and human trafficking prevention and awareness.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0538PN2147 - 6 - 1234567891011121314